New Jersey, session 222, A654.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person subject to the registration requirements set forth in P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-1 et seq.) who has committed a sex offense as defined in section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2) and whose victim was under the age of 18 shall not be employed or work as a volunteer at an amusement park as defined in section 1 of P.L.1992, c.118 (C.5:3-55) or sell items to the public from a frozen dessert truck as defined in section 1 of P.L.1979, c.438 (C.39:4-128.3). b.    A violation of this section is a crime of the fourth degree. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month following enactment.